Mississippi statutes. Title 5. Legislative Department
Legislative Oversight Committee; Highway Refunding Bonds

§ 5-3-141.
Membership; authority; expenses.

There is hereby created the Mississippi Legislative Oversight Committee. Such oversight committee shall consist of three (3) representatives appointed by the Speaker of the House of Representatives and three (3) senators appointed by the Lieutenant Governor, and they shall be appointed within ten (10) days after April 4, 1985. The legislative oversight committee shall serve in an advisory capacity to the State Bond Commission in connection with the issuance of refunding bonds under Laws, 1985, Chapter 469, Sections 1-3, and the legislative members thereof shall report the actions of the State Bond Commission to the appropriate legislative committees. The legislative oversight committee shall have no jurisdiction or vote on any matter within the jurisdiction of the State Bond Commission. When the Legislature is not in session, members of the legislative oversight committee shall be paid per diem and all actual and necessary expenses, including, without limitation, travel expenses both within and without the state, from their respective contingent expense funds at the rate authorized for committee meetings when the Legislature is not in session. The State Bond Commission is authorized to reimburse the aforementioned contingent expense funds for such per diem and all other reasonable expenses paid by such funds, but the State Bond Commission shall pay the same only from the proceeds of refunding bonds and the State Bond Commission shall treat the same as part of the cost of issuing such bonds. The terms of the members of the legislative oversight committee shall expire at the end of their terms of office.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1985, ch. 469, § 4, eff from and after passage (approved April 4, 1985).